Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 101
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For bank deposits and collections, see article 4 of title 4; for limitation of this code with reference to corporations, see § 11-107-111; for the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", see article 13 of title 38.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

ommercial and

C

orporate Law", which discusses Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with banking, see 64 Den. U.L. Rev. 184 (1987); for a discussion of Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with banking, see 66 Den. U.L. Rev. 681 (1989); for article "Arbitrating Lender Liability Claims", see 18 Colo. Law. 879 (1989); for a discussion of Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with banking and finance law, see 67 Den. U. L. Rev. 629 (1990).

Section

PART 1 SHORT TITLE AND POLICY

PART 2 EFFECT ON EXISTING BANKS

PART 3 APPLICATION

PART 4 DEFINITIONS